Utah statutes.
70C-6-102.   Definition -- Consumer credit insurance.

"Consumer credit insurance" means insurance, other than insurance on property, by which the satisfaction of debt in whole or in part is a benefit provided, but does not include:

(1)  insurance issued as an isolated transaction on the part of the insurer not related to an agreement or plan for insuring debtors of the creditor; or

(2)  insurance indemnifying the creditor against loss due to the debtor's default.

